Tennessee, session 114, HB1735.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-3-113, is amended by deleting the
first and second sentences of the section and substituting:
The state board shall establish a review committee for the TISA. The committee
must be composed of the executive director of the state board, or the executive
director's designee; the commissioner of education, or the commissioner's
designee; the commissioner of finance and administration, or the commissioner's
designee; the comptroller of the treasury, or the comptroller's designee; the
director of the Tennessee advisory commission on intergovernmental relations,
or the director's designee; the chair of the education committee of the senate; the
chair of the education committee of the house of representatives; and the director
of the office of legislative budget analysis, or the director's designee.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB1735
011091
- 1 -